Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 4 Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act
8-4-317. State implementation plans generally.

In developing and implementing a state implementation plan, the Division of Environmental Quality shall consider and take into account the factors specified in § 8-4-312 and the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq., as applicable.

Whenever the division proposes to finalize a state implementation plan submittal for review and approval by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, it shall cause notice of its proposed action to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the state.

The notice required under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall afford any interested party at least thirty (30) calendar days in which to submit comments on the proposed state implementation plan submittal in its entirety.

In the case of any emission limit, work practice or operational standard, environmental standard, analytical method, air dispersion modeling requirement, or monitoring requirement that is incorporated as an element of the proposed state implementation plan submittal, the record of the proposed action shall include a written explanation of the rationale for the proposal, demonstrating the reasoned consideration of the factors in § 8-4-312 as applicable, the need for each measure in attaining or maintaining the National Ambient Air Quality Standards as applicable, and that any requirements or standards are based upon generally accepted scientific knowledge and engineering practices.

For any standard or requirement that is identical to the applicable Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission rule or federal regulation, the demonstration required under subdivision (b)(1)(C)(i) of this section may be satisfied by reference to the rule or federal regulation. In all other cases, the division shall provide its own justification with appropriate reference to the scientific and engineering literature considered or the written studies conducted by the division.

At the conclusion of the public comment period and before transmittal to the Governor for submittal to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the division shall provide written notice of its final decision regarding the state implementation plan submittal to all persons who submitted public comments.

The division's final decision shall include a response to each issue raised in any public comments received during the public comment period. The response shall manifest reasoned consideration of the issues raised by the public comments and shall be supported by appropriate legal, scientific, or practical reasons for accepting or rejecting the substance of the comment in the division's final decision.

For the purposes of this section, response to comments by the division should serve the roles of both developing the record for possible judicial review of a state implementation plan decision and serving as a record for the public's review of the division's technical and legal interpretations on long-range regulatory issues.

This section does not limit the division's authority to raise all relevant issues of regulatory concern upon adjudicatory review by the commission of a particular state implementation plan decision.

Only those persons that submit comments on the record during the public comment period have standing to appeal the final decision of the division to the commission upon written application made within thirty (30) days after service of the notice under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.

An appeal under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be processed as a permit appeal under § 8-4-205. However, the decision of the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality shall remain in effect during the appeal.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1302, § 4; 2017, No. 455, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 501; 2019, No. 910, §§
2543-2547.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “as applicable” near the end of (b)(1)(C)(i); and substituted “the applicable Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission regulation or federal regulation” for “an applicable federal regulation” in the first sentence of (b)(1)(C)(ii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315, in the first sentence of (b)(1)(C)(ii), substituted “rule” for “regulation” and inserted “rule or federal” near the end.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” and “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-4-318. National Ambient Air Quality Standards implementation.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall develop NAAQS state implementation plans.

Each NAAQS state implementation plan shall include the measures necessary for the attainment and maintenance of the National Ambient Air Quality Standard in each air quality control region or portion of an air quality control region within the state.

Except with regard to permitting decisions for major source construction under Part C or D of Title I of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7470 et seq. or 42 U.S.C. § 7501 et seq., National Ambient Air Quality Standards are not effective until adopted by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission under § 8-4-311(b).

Except as required for the permitting of major source construction under Part C or D of Title I of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7470 et seq. or 42 U.S.C. § 7501 et seq., or otherwise voluntarily proposed and agreed to by the owner or operator of a stationary source, the division shall not mandate for any stationary source measures for the attainment and maintenance of a National Ambient Air Quality Standard until such measures are included in the applicable NAAQS state implementation plan and the NAAQS state implementation plan has been submitted to the United States Environmental Protection Agency. However, this subdivision (b)(2) does not limit or delay the effectiveness of any applicable emission limit or standard promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under §§ 111, 112, or 129 of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7411, 42 U.S.C. § 7412, or 42 U.S.C. § 7429.

Unless otherwise voluntarily proposed and agreed to by the owner or operator of a stationary source, the division shall not require or consider air dispersion modeling of an air contaminant for which a National Ambient Air Quality Standard has been established in air permitting decisions for stationary sources except:

As required by Part C of Title I of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7470 et seq., and the federal regulations promulgated thereto, for the permitting of major source construction;

If necessary in the judgment of the division, with respect to permitting of a temporary source under 42 U.S.C. § 7661c(e); or

Pollutant-specific or facility-specific air dispersion modeling explicitly required by an applicable NAAQS state implementation plan submitted to the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

This section does not prohibit the division from conducting and considering air dispersion modeling as necessary for the:

Development of a state implementation plan; or

Development of a general permit under § 8-4-203.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1302, § 5; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2548-2552.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (b) and (c).

Subchapter 4
— Lead-Based Paint-Hazard Act

Publisher's Notes.

For current law, see the “Arkansas Lead-Based Paint-Hazard Act of 2011”, § 20-27-2501 et seq.

8-4-401 — 8-4-409. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning the Lead-Based Paint-Hazard Act, was repealed by Acts 2011, No. 1011, § 2. The former subchapter was derived from the following sources:

8-4-401. Acts 1997, No. 309, § 1.

8-4-402. Acts 1997, No. 309, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 35.

8-4-403. Acts 1997, No. 309, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, §§ 36, 37.

8-4-404. Acts 1997, No. 309, § 1.

8-4-405. Acts 1997, No. 309, § 1.

8-4-406. Acts 1997, No. 309, § 1.

8-4-407. Acts 1997, No. 309, § 1.

8-4-408. Acts 1997, No. 309, § 1; 2009, No. 1199, § 5.

8-4-409. Acts 1997, No. 309, § 1; 1999, No. 53, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 38.